Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1012.
do enact as follows:SB1012,11Section 1. 70.38 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,3,3270.38 (1m) Estimated liability. Upon written request and for sufficient 3reason shown, the department shall allow a person subject to the tax under s. 470.375 to file, on or before June 15, a net proceeds tax return and to pay that tax 5based upon estimated tax liability. On or before September 15, that person shall 6file a final report and pay any additional tax due along with interest at the rate of 71 percent per month interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) from June 15 until the 8date of payment. If the additional tax exceeds 10 percent of the person’s tax under 1s. 70.375 for the previous year, the penalty and interest under s. 70.39 (1) apply. If 2the final report indicates that the person overpaid the person’s liability, the 3department shall refund the overpayment.SB1012,24Section 2. 71.03 (7) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,3,19571.03 (7) Extension of time to file. (intro.) Returns of natural persons and 6fiduciaries that require a statement of amounts or information contained or entered 7on a corresponding return under the internal revenue code shall be filed within the 8time fixed under that code for filing of the corresponding federal return. Any 9extension of time granted by law or by the internal revenue service for the filing of 10that corresponding federal return extends the time for filing under this chapter if a 11copy of the taxpayer’s application to the internal revenue service requesting the 12extension is filed with the return under this chapter or if a copy of any request for 13an extension required by the internal revenue service is filed with the return under 14this chapter or at an earlier date that the department prescribes by rule and if the 15taxpayer pays the Wisconsin tax in the manner applicable to federal income taxes 16under the internal revenue code. Taxes payable upon the filing of the return do not 17become delinquent during the period of an extension but are subject to interest at 18the rate of 12 percent per year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) during such 19period except as follows:SB1012,320Section 3. 71.24 (7) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,4,82171.24 (7) (a) In the case of a corporation required to file a return, the 22department of revenue shall allow an automatic extension of 7 months or until the 23original due date of the corporation’s corresponding federal return, whichever is 1later. Any extension of time granted by law or by the internal revenue service for 2the filing of corresponding federal returns shall extend the time for filing under this 3subchapter to 30 days after the federal due date if the corporation reports the 4extension in the manner specified by the department on the return. Except for 5payments of estimated taxes, income or franchise taxes payable upon the filing of 6the tax return shall not become delinquent during such extension period, but shall, 7except as provided in par. (b), be subject to interest at the rate of 12 percent per year 8interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) during such period.SB1012,49Section 4. 71.44 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,4,201071.44 (3) (a) In the case of a corporation required to file a return, the 11department of revenue shall allow an automatic extension of 7 months or until the 12original due date of the corporation’s corresponding federal return, whichever is 13later. Any extension of time granted by law or by the internal revenue service for 14the filing of corresponding federal returns shall extend the time for filing under this 15subchapter to 30 days after the federal due date if the corporation reports the 16extension in the manner specified by the department on the return. Except for 17payments of estimated taxes, income or franchise taxes payable upon the filing of 18the tax return shall not become delinquent during such extension period, but shall, 19except as provided in par. (b), be subject to interest at the rate of 12 percent per year 20interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) during such period.SB1012,521Section 5. 71.775 (4) (bm) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,5,52271.775 (4) (bm) 1. For the return under par. (a), the department shall allow an 23automatic extension of 7 months or until the corresponding due date of the pass-1through entity’s federal income tax return or return of partnership income, 2whichever is later. Except for payments of estimated taxes, and except as provided 3in subd. 2., withholding taxes payable upon filing the return are not delinquent 4during the extension period but shall be subject to interest at the rate of 12 percent 5per year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) during that period.SB1012,66Section 6. 71.775 (4) (bm) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,5,12771.775 (4) (bm) 2. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2008, for 8persons who qualify for a federal extension of time to file under 26 USC 7508A due 9to a presidentially declared disaster or terroristic or military action, withholding 10taxes that are otherwise due from a pass-through entity under sub. (2) are not 11subject to 12 percent interest as otherwise provided under subd. 1. during the 12extension period and for 30 days after the end of the federal extension period.SB1012,713Section 7. 71.775 (4) (em) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,6,21471.775 (4) (em) Except as provided in par. (fm), in the case of any 15underpayment of estimated withholding taxes under par. (cm), interest shall be 16added to the aggregate withholding tax for the taxable year at the rate of 12 percent 17per year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) on the amount of the 18underpayment for the period of the underpayment. In this paragraph, “period of 19the underpayment” means the time period beginning with the due date of the 20installment and ending on either the unextended due date of the return under par. 21(a) or the date of payment, whichever is earlier. If 90 percent of the tax due under 22sub. (2) for the taxable year is not paid by the unextended due date of the return 23under par. (a), the difference between that amount and the estimated taxes paid, 1along with any interest due, shall accrue delinquent interest in the same manner as 2income and franchise taxes under s. 71.82 (2) (a).SB1012,83Section 8. 71.82 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,6,8471.82 (1) Normal. (a) In assessing taxes interest shall be added to such 5taxes at 12 percent per year the rate of interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) from 6the date on which such taxes if originally assessed would have become delinquent if 7unpaid, to the date on which such taxes when subsequently assessed will become 8delinquent if unpaid.SB1012,6,229(b) Except as otherwise specifically provided, in crediting overpayments of 10income and surtaxes against underpayments or against taxes to be subsequently 11collected and in certifying refunds of such taxes interest shall be added at the rate 12of 3 percent per year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) from the date on which 13such taxes when assessed would have become delinquent if unpaid to the date on 14which such overpayment was certified for refund except that if any overpayment of 15tax is certified for refund within 90 days after the last date prescribed for filing the 16return of such tax or 90 days after the date of actual filing of the return of such tax, 17whichever occurs later, no interest shall be allowed on such overpayment. For 18purposes of this section the return of such tax shall not be deemed actually filed by 19an employee unless and until the employee has included the written statement 20required to be filed under s. 71.65 (1). However when any part of a tax paid on an 21estimate of income, whether paid in connection with a tentative return or not, is 22refunded or credited to a taxpayer, such refund or credit shall not draw interest.SB1012,7,323(c) Any assessment made as a result of the adjustment or disallowance of a 1claim for credit under s. 71.07, 71.28 or 71.47 or subch. VIII or IX, except as 2provided in sub. (2) (c), shall bear interest at 12 percent per year the rate of interest 3determined under s. 73.03 (78) from the due date of the claim.SB1012,94Section 9. 71.82 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,7,8571.82 (2) (b) Department may reduce delinquent interest. The department 6shall provide by rule for reduction of interest under par. (a) to 12 percent per year 7the rate of interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) in stated instances wherein the 8secretary of revenue determines that reduction is fair and equitable.SB1012,109Section 10. 71.82 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,8,51071.82 (2) (d) Withholding tax. Of the amounts required to be withheld any 11amount not deposited or paid over to the department within the time required shall 12be deemed delinquent and deposit reports or withholding reports filed after the due 13date shall be deemed late. Delinquent deposits or payments shall bear interest at 14the rate of 1.5 percent per month from the date deposits or payments are required 15under this section until deposited or paid over to the department. The department 16shall provide by rule for reduction of interest on delinquent deposits to 12 percent 17per year the rate of interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) in stated instances 18wherein the secretary of revenue determines reduction fair and equitable. In the 19case of a timely filed deposit or withholding report, withheld taxes shall become 20delinquent if not deposited or paid over on or before the due date of the report. In 21the case of no report filed or a report filed late, withheld taxes shall become 22delinquent if not deposited or paid over by the due date of the report. In the case of 23an assessment under s. 71.83 (1) (b) 2., the amount assessed shall become 1delinquent if not paid on or before the first day of the calendar month following the 2calendar month in which the assessment becomes final, but if the assessment is 3contested before the tax appeals commission or in the courts, it shall become 4delinquent on the 30th day following the date on which the order or judgment 5representing final determination becomes final.SB1012,116Section 11. 71.84 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,8,14771.84 (1) Individuals and fiduciaries. Except as provided in s. 71.09 (11), 8in the case of any underpayment of estimated tax by an individual, estate or trust, 9except as provided under s. 71.09, there shall be added to the aggregate tax for the 10taxable year interest at the rate of 12 percent per year interest determined under s. 1173.03 (78) on the amount of the underpayment for the period of the underpayment. 12In this subsection, “the period of the underpayment” means the time period from 13the due date of the installment until either the 15th day of the 4th month beginning 14after the end of the taxable year or the date of payment, whichever is earlier.SB1012,1215Section 12. 71.84 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,9,51671.84 (2) (a) Except as provided in s. 71.29 (7), in the case of any 17underpayment of estimated tax by a corporation under s. 71.29 or 71.48, there shall 18be added to the aggregate tax for the taxable year interest at the rate of 12 percent 19per year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) on the amount of the 20underpayment for the period of the underpayment. In this paragraph, “period of 21the underpayment” means the time period from the due date of the installment 22until either the date on which the corporation is required to file for federal income 23tax purposes, not including any extension, under the Internal Revenue Code or the 1date of payment, whichever is earlier. If 90 percent of the tax shown on the return 2is not paid by the date on which the corporation is required to file for federal income 3tax purposes, not including any extension, under the Internal Revenue Code, the 4difference between that amount and the estimated taxes paid, along with any 5interest due, shall accrue delinquent interest under s. 71.91 (1) (a).SB1012,136Section 13. 71.84 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,9,15771.84 (2) (b) For corporations that are subject to a tax under this chapter on 8unrelated business taxable income, as defined under section 512 of the internal 9revenue code, and virtually exempt entities, “period of the underpayment” means 10the time period from the due date of the installment until either the 15th day of the 115th month beginning after the end of the taxable year or the date of payment, 12whichever is earlier. If 90 percent of the tax shown on the return is not paid by the 1315th day of the 5th month following the close of the taxable year, the difference 14between that amount and the estimated taxes paid along with any interest due, 15shall accrue delinquent interest under s. 71.91 (1) (a).SB1012,1416Section 14. 71.84 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,9,221771.84 (2) (c) If a refund under s. 71.29 (3m) results in an income or franchise 18tax liability that is greater than the amount of estimated taxes paid when reduced 19by the amount of the refund, the taxpayer shall add to the aggregate tax for the 20taxable year interest at an annual rate of 12 percent the rate determined under s. 2173.03 (78) on the amount of the unpaid tax liability for the period beginning on the 22date the refund is issued and ending on either the date on which the taxpayer is 1required to file for federal income tax purposes, not including any extension, under 2the Internal Revenue Code or the date the tax liability is paid, whichever is earlier.SB1012,153Section 15. 71.90 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,10,20471.90 (1) Deposit. The department shall notify any person who files a 5petition for redetermination that the person may deposit the amount of an 6additional assessment, including any interest or penalty, with the department, or 7with a person that the department prescribes, at any time before the department 8makes its redetermination. The department shall notify spouses jointly except 9that, if the spouses have different addresses and if either spouse notifies the 10department in writing of those addresses, the department shall serve a duplicate of 11the original notice on the spouse who has the address other than the address to 12which the original notice was sent. Amounts deposited under this subsection shall 13be subject to the interest provided by s. 71.82 only to the extent of the interest 14accrued prior to the first day of the month succeeding the date of deposit. Any 15deposited amount which is refunded shall bear interest at the rate of 3 percent per 16year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) during the time the funds were on 17deposit. A person may also pay any portion of an assessment which is admitted to 18be correct and the payment shall be considered an admission of the validity of that 19portion of the assessment and may not be recovered in an appeal or in any other 20action or proceeding.SB1012,1621Section 16. 71.91 (6) (e) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,11,42271.91 (6) (e) 3. For purposes of an adjudication under this paragraph, the 23assessment of the tax upon which the interest or lien of the department is based is 1conclusively presumed to be valid. Interest shall be allowed for judgments under 2this paragraph at the rate of 12 percent per year interest determined under s. 73.03 3(78) from the date the department receives the money wrongfully levied upon to the 4date of payment of the judgment or from the date of sale to the date of payment.SB1012,175Section 17. 71.91 (6) (f) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,11,22671.91 (6) (f) 5. Before the sale, the department shall determine a minimum 7price for which the property shall be sold. If no person offers for that property at the 8sale at least the amount of the minimum price, the state shall purchase the 9property for the minimum price; otherwise, the property shall be sold to the highest 10bidder. In determining the minimum price, the department shall take into account 11the expense of making the levy and sale in addition to the value of the property. If 12payment in full is required at the time of acceptance of a bid and is not paid then, 13the department shall sell the property in the manner provided under this 14paragraph. If the conditions of the sale permit part of the payment to be deferred 15and if that part is not paid within the prescribed period, the department may sue 16the purchaser in the circuit court for Dane County for the unpaid part of the 17purchase price and interest at the rate of 12 percent per year interest determined 18under s. 73.03 (78) from the date of the sale or the department may declare the sale 19void and may sell the property again under this paragraph. If the property is sold 20again, the 2nd purchaser shall receive it free of any claim of the defaulting 21purchaser and the amount paid upon the bid price by the defaulting purchaser is 22forfeited.SB1012,1823Section 18. 73.03 (6) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1012,12,16173.03 (6) In its discretion to inspect and examine or cause an inspection and 2examination of the records of any town, city, village, or county officer whenever 3such officer shall have failed or neglected to return properly the information as 4required by sub. (5), within the time set by the department of revenue. Upon the 5completion of such inspection and examination the department of revenue shall 6transmit to the clerk of the town, city, village, or county a statement of the expenses 7incurred by the department of revenue to secure the necessary information. 8Duplicates of such statements shall be filed in the office of the secretary of 9administration. Within 60 days after the receipt of the above statement, the same 10shall be audited, as other claims of towns, cities, villages, and counties are audited, 11and shall be paid into the state treasury, in default of which the same shall become 12a special charge against such town, city, village, or county and be included in the 13next apportionment or certification of state taxes and charges, and collected with 14interest at the rate of 10 percent per year interest determined under s. 73.03 (78) 15from the date such statements were certified by the department, as other special 16charges are certified and collected.SB1012,1917Section 19. 73.03 (78) of the statutes is created to read:SB1012,12,221873.03 (78) (a) Beginning in 2026, to annually determine a monthly interest 19rate to be used in calculating interest during each year as provided in this 20subsection. A monthly interest rate determined under this subsection becomes 21effective on January 1 of the year for which it is determined and applies to interest 22that accrues during that year.SB1012,12,2423(b) The department shall determine the monthly interest rate under this 24subsection as follows:SB1012,13,311. Add one to the effective federal funds rate published by the federal reserve 2bank of New York for January 2 of the applicable year or, if no effective federal 3funds rate is published for January 2, for the next day for which a rate is published.SB1012,13,442. Raise the amount determined under subd. 1. to the power of one-twelfth. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1012 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1012 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1012 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1012 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1012: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting